Your preference has been updated for this session. To permanently change your account setting, go to
My Account
As a reminder, you can update you preferred country or language anytime in
My Account
>
iherblogo
beauty2
heart-circle
sports-fitness
food-nutrition
herbs-supplements
pageview
Home
Privacy Policy | iHerb
Privacy Policy | iHerb
iHerb Privacy Policy
Effective Date: August 5, 2021
iHerb, LLC. and its subsidiaries, including iHerb Netherlands B.V. (
collectively
, “iHerb”), respect your
  concerns about privacy. This Privacy Policy describes the types of personal
  information we collect about individuals through our website and mobile apps
  (collectively, the “Services”), how we may use the information, with whom we
  may share it, and the choices available regarding our use of the information.
  The Privacy Policy also describes the measures we take to safeguard the
  personal information, how long we retain it and how individuals can contact us
  about our privacy practices and to exercise their rights.
Click on one of the links below to jump to the listed section:
Country-specific Privacy Policies
Information We Obtain
How We Use The Information We Obtain
Automated Collection Of Data
Information Sharing
Data Transfers
Your Rights And Choices
Other Online Services And Third-Party Features
Retention Of Personal Information
How We Protect Personal Information
Children’s Personal Information
Updates To Our Privacy Policy
How To Contact Us
California Consumer Privacy Statement
Country-specific Privacy Policies
Data protection and privacy rules differ worldwide. For this reason, and in certain cases we have to change our privacy practices due to specific legal requirements  in countries where we do our business.
This document may include some information specific for certain categories of users, for example, residents of California. In addition, we can also elaborate separate Privacy Policies, where our data protection and privacy practices differ from the ones described in this document due to local legal requirements.
Russia/Kazakhstan
Korea
In addition, if you apply for a job with us, please see our
Career’s Privacy Notice
.
Information We Obtain
In connection with your use of the Services, you may provide personal
  information to us in various ways. The types of personal information we obtain
  include:
contact information (such as name, email address, shipping address and instructions, postal
    code, telephone number, and personal ID);
login credentials to create an account on the Services (such as email
    address and password);
information contained on your social media public profile, to the extent you
    decide to create an account on the Services using your social media account;
information you choose to submit on your personalized public profile “My
    Page”, including web address name, user name, photograph, links to your
    social media accounts and any other information you choose to submit on the
    “Page Description” section of your “My Page”;
user generated content related to product reviews, comments, questions and
    answers;
payment information, such as name, billing address, account number, and
    payment card details (including card number, expiration date and security
    code) for payments processed by us. To the extent any payments are processed
    by any other third parties such as PayPal or Apple Pay, then the privacy
    policies of those parties shall govern such information;
bank account and tax information related to any company programs that may
    offer customer payouts (such as Rewards program);
order history, including information about products purchased or viewed on
    the Services;
details you provide through contests, sweepstakes and surveys;
social media information, such as social media handles, content and other
    data shared with us through third-party features that you use on our
    Services (such as apps, tools, payment services, widgets and plugins offered
    by social media services like Facebook, Google , Instagram, LinkedIn,
    Pinterest, Twitter and YouTube) or posted on social media pages (such as our
    social media pages or other pages accessible to us);
other personal information contained in content you submit on the Services,
    such as through our “Contact Us” feature or other customer support tools;
    and
Country/region and language preference based on mobile device settings
    and/or IP;
IP address, device, operating system, and browser information that we
    detect.
You are not required to provide this information but, if you choose not to do
  so, we may not be able to offer you certain Services and related features.
How We Use The Information We Obtain
We will use the information we obtain through the Services as needed to
  fulfill our contractual obligation to provide you with the products and
  services you request and to deliver products ordered (including, but not limited
  to, transportation and customs clearance through related third party service
  providers).
We also will use the information we obtain through the Services if we have a
  legitimate interest to do so, including to support the following functions and
  activities:
establishing and managing your account;
communicating with you about your account or transactions and sending you
    information about features and enhancements;
processing claims in connection with our products and services, and keeping
    you informed about the status of your order;
managing our Rewards and loyalty programs;
posting your product reviews and managing our Reviews program;
improving and customizing your experience with the Services, including
    providing recommendations based on your preferences;
identifying and authenticating you so you may use the Services;
marketing our products to you and providing you with promotions, including
    special deals, coupons, discounts and chances to win contests;
communicating with you about, and administering your participation in,
    contests, sweepstakes or surveys;
responding to your requests and inquiries and providing customer support, such as through our chatbot or other customer support tools;
operating, evaluating and improving our business (including developing new
    services; enhancing and improving our Services; managing our communications;
    analyzing our user base and Services; performing data analytics and market
    research; and performing accounting, auditing and other internal functions);
protecting against, identifying and preventing fraud and other criminal
    activity, claims and other liabilities;
complying with and enforcing applicable legal requirements, relevant
    industry standards and our policies, including this Privacy Policy and
    iHerb’s
Terms of Use
,
Rewards Program Terms of Use
; and
communicating with you about changes to our policies.
In addition, we will use your contact information to send you Health
  Newsletters, emails, SMS, push notifications and in-app notifications about our
  products, services, sales and special offers if you sign up to receive them
  and have not opted out. We also may use your email address to display ads for our products, services, sales and special offers through Facebook’s and Google’s sites or networks. For example, if you are on Facebook, you may see our ads on the social media platform, or if you sign in to your Google account, you may see our ads as you use the Google search engine, Instagram, Facebook, Facebook Audience Network, YouTube, Gmail, and the Google Display Network because these third parties will match your email address with you. To the extent provided by applicable law, you can object at any time to the use of your e-mail address for advertising purposes as specified in the
Rights And Choices
section below.
We may combine information we obtain about you through our websites with the
  information obtained through our apps for the purposes described above. We
  also may use the information we obtain in other ways for which we provide
  specific notice at the time of collection or otherwise with your consent.
Automated Collection Of Data
When you use our Services or open our emails, we may obtain certain
  information by automated means, such as browser cookies, Flash cookies, local storage, web
  beacons and pixels, JavaScript, device identifiers, server logs and other technologies. The
  information we obtain in this manner may include your device IP address,
  domain name, identifiers associated with your devices, device and operating
  system type and characteristics, web browser characteristics, language
  preferences, clickstream data, your interactions with our Services (such as
  the web pages you visit, links you click and features you use), the pages that
  led or referred you to our Services, dates and times of access to our
  Services, and other information about your use of our Services. We also may
  receive your device’s geolocation and other information related to your
  location through GPS, Bluetooth, WiFi signals and other technologies for
  certain purposes listed above, such as to provide you with our Services. Your
  device may provide you with a notification when the Services attempt to
  collect your precise geolocation.
A “cookie” is a text file that websites send to a visitor’s computer or other
  Internet-connected device to uniquely identify the visitor’s browser or to
  store information or settings in the browser. Cookies may be set either directly by the website a user is visiting (“first-party cookies”), or by a domain other than the website the user is visiting (“third-party cookies”). A “Flash cookie,” also known as
  a local shared object, functions like a web cookie to personalize a user’s
  experience on sites that use Adobe Flash Player. A “web beacon,” also known as
  an Internet tag, pixel tag or clear GIF, links web pages to web servers and
  their cookies and may be used to transmit information collected through
  cookies back to a web server. We and our third-party service providers may use
  beacons in emails to help us track response rates, identify when our emails
  are accessed or forwarded, and for other purposes listed above.
The following types of cookies and similar technologies are used on the
  Services:
Necessary Cookies
We use necessary cookies to help enable the Services to function, including
  to (1) identify you once you have logged in to your account, (2) keep track of preferences you specify while you use the Services, and (3) manage the security of the Services.
Functionality Cookies
Our Services also use cookies to personalize the content of the Services based on your use of the Services, and support certain third-party services to provide enhanced functionality, such as to enable videos posted on the Services from YouTube. These features use third-party cookies (e.g., You Tube cookies) that are placed directly on your device by the third-party services. The privacy practices of these third parties, including details on the information they may collect about you, are subject to the privacy notices of these parties, which we strongly suggest you review.
Analytics Cookies
Through our Services, we may obtain personal information about your online activities over time and across third-party apps, websites, devices and other online services. On our Services, we use third-party online analytics services, such as those of Google Analytics. The service providers that administer these analytics services use automated technologies to collect data (such as email address, IP addresses, cookies and other device identifiers) to evaluate, for example, use of our Services and to diagnose technical issues. To learn more about Google Analytics, please visit
http://www.google.com/analytics/learn/privacy
, and to opt out of being tracked by Google Analytics across all websites, please visit:
http://tools.google.com/dlpage/gaoptout
. In addition, our Services use FullStory analytics cookies and similar technologies (local storage) to collect technical information from your device (such as IP address, device and operating system type, browser and approximate geographic location based on your device IP address), as well as information about your interactions with our Services (such as clickstream, browsing and keystroke data, and  the referring URL and session duration). This information allows us to recreate your sessions so we can get a better understanding of how you use our Services, troubleshoot issues, and administer and improve our Services.
Personalized Advertising Cookies
Through our Services, both we and certain third parties may collect
  information about your online activities to provide you with advertising about
  products and services tailored to your individual interests. You may see our
  ads on other websites or mobile apps because we participate in advertising
  networks. Ad networks allow us to target our messaging to users considering
  demographic data, users’ inferred interests and browsing context. These
  networks track users’ online activities over time by collecting information
  through automated means, including through the use of browser cookies, web
  beacons, device identifiers, server logs, web beacons and other similar
  technologies. The networks use this information to show ads that may be
  tailored to individuals’ interests, to track users’ browsers or devices across
  multiple websites and apps, and to build a profile of users’ online browsing
  and app usage activities. The information our ad networks may collect includes
  data about users’ visits to websites and apps that participate in the relevant
  ad networks, such as the pages or ads viewed and the actions taken on the
  websites or apps. This data collection takes place both on our Services and on
  third-party websites and apps that participate in the ad networks. This
  process also helps us track the effectiveness of our marketing efforts.
To learn how to opt out of ad network interest-based advertising in the U.S.,
  please visit
www.aboutads.info/choices
and
http://www.networkadvertising.org/choices/
. In the European Union, please visit
www.youronlinechoices.eu
.
If you are located in the European Economic Area (“EEA”) or the United Kingdom (“UK”), Russia or Kazakhstan, you can learn more on our use of cookies and similar technologies, including the companies using cookies on our Services, the individual cookies used and their duration, by clicking on the “Cookie Preferences” icon at the bottom of each page of our Services.
How to Change Your Cookie Settings
To the extent required by applicable law, we will obtain your consent before placing non-essential cookies or similar technologies on your device, and keep your choice for a period of six (6) months. If you are located in the European Economic Area (“EEA”) or the United Kingdom (“UK”), Russia or Kazakhstan, you can change your cookie preferences at any time by clicking on the “Cookie Preferences” icon at the bottom of each page of our Services.
You also can stop certain types of cookies from being downloaded on your device by selecting the appropriate settings on your web browser. Most web browsers will tell you how to stop accepting new browser cookies, how to be notified when you receive a new browser cookie and how to disable existing cookies. The following external links will explain how to manage cookies for the most common browsers:
Google Chrome
Microsoft Edge
Mozilla Firefox
Microsoft Internet Explorer
Opera
Apple Safari
To find out how to manage cookies for other browsers, please click “help” on your browser’s menu or visit www.allaboutcookies.org. [Flash cookies typically cannot be controlled, deleted or disabled through your browser settings and instead must be managed through your Adobe Flash Player settings. To manage Flash cookies, which we may use on our website from time to time, you can go to the Adobe Flash Player Support page available here. In addition, your mobile device settings may allow you to prohibit mobile app platforms (such as Apple and Google) from sharing certain information obtained by automated means with app developers and operators such as us. Our Services are not designed to respond to “do not track” signals received from browsers. Please note that without cookies or other automated tools we use to collect this type of data, you may not be able to use all the features of our Services.
Chatbot Logs
Our Services also use a chatbot to provide automated customer assistance. A chatbot is a computer program that communicates with you, using text on a digital message interface and artificial intelligence. Put simply, if you ask a question through our chatbot, the chatbot will reply to you in human-ish behavior. Our chatbot is supported by Ada Support, a third-party chatbot service provider located in Canada, who performs services on our behalf (“Ada”). Ada uses an automated decision making process, when deciding on the correct answer to serve based on your question, and will receive message logs and usernames when you interact with the chatbot. Message logs contain information such as details of your account with us, including your username, e-mail address, phone number and address, as well as any other content you choose to submit when you make a customer support inquiry through the chatbot. Ada will retain the content of those messages, together with responses to those messages and any outcome from those messages. This information will be retained for twelve (12) months and will be used only to provide customer support and improve the quality of the chatbot services. If you are located in the EEA, UK or Switzerland, the above information will be transferred to Ada in Canada - a country which has been recognized by the European Commission, UK and Swiss Administration as providing an adequate level of data protection.
Information Sharing
We do not disclose personal information we obtain about you, except as
  described in this Privacy Policy. We will share your personal information with
  our (1) subsidiaries and affiliates, and (2) third-party service providers who
  perform services on our behalf (such as website hosting, payment processing and authorization,
  order fulfillment, transportation, customs clearance, marketing, data
  analytics, customer support and fraud prevention) for the purposes described
  in this Privacy Policy. We do not authorize our service providers to use or
  disclose the information except as necessary to perform services on our behalf
  or comply with legal requirements.
We also may disclose information about you: (1) if we are required to do so by
  law or legal process (such as a court order or subpoena); (2) in response to
  requests by government agencies, such as law enforcement authorities; (3) to
  establish, exercise or defend our legal rights; (4) when we believe disclosure
  is necessary or appropriate to prevent physical or other harm or financial
  loss; (5) in connection with an investigation of suspected or actual illegal
  activity; (6) in the event we sell or transfer all or a portion of our
  business or assets (including in the event of a reorganization, dissolution or
  liquidation); or (7) otherwise with your consent.
Data Transfers
We may transfer the personal information we collect about you to recipients in
  countries other than the country in which the information originally was
  collected. Those countries may not have the same data protection laws as the
  country in which you initially provided the information. When we transfer your
  information to recipients in other countries (such as the U.S.), we will
  protect that information as described in this Privacy Policy and will comply
  with applicable legal requirements providing adequate protection for the
  transfer of personal information to recipients in countries other than the one
  in which you provided the information, including by selecting service providers that are located in a country recognized by the European Commission as providing an adequate level of data protection or by implementing appropriate safeguards based on the European Commission’s Standard Contractual Clauses, where applicable. Subject to applicable law, you may obtain a copy of these safeguards by contacting us as indicated in the
How to Contact Us
section below.
iHerb, LLC. is
  certified under the EU-U.S. and Swiss-U.S. Privacy Shield frameworks developed
  by the U.S. Department of Commerce, and the European Commission and Swiss
  Federal Data Protection and Information Commissioner, respectively.
Click here
to view our EU/Swiss-U.S. Privacy Shield Privacy Policy. As of July 16, 2020, we no longer rely on the Privacy Shield to transfer personal information to the U.S.
Your Rights And Choices
We offer you certain choices in connection with the personal information we
  obtain about you. For example, if you have created an account with us, you can
  change your communication preferences by logging into your account and
  clicking on “Communication Preferences”. To the extent provided by applicable
  law, you also can object to the use of your personal information for advertising or direct
  marketing purposes and unsubscribe from our marketing mailing lists by
  following the “Unsubscribe” link in our emails, texting STOP to the short code number from which our SMS are being sent or contacting us as specified
  in the
How to Contact Us
section below. We will apply
  your preferences going forward.
To the extent provided by applicable law, you may: (1) request access to the
  personal information we maintain about you; (2) request that we update,
  correct, amend, or erase your information; or (3) request the restriction of
  our use of your personal information, by contacting us as specified in the
How to Contact Us
section below.
If you are located in the EEA and the UK, to the extent provided by applicable law, you
  also may object to the use of your personal information in certain situations
  in which we use that information based on our legitimate interests, as
  described above. In addition, to the extent provided by applicable law, you
  may receive, in a structured, commonly used and machine-readable format, your
  personal information you have provided to us based on your consent or a
  contract to which you are party. You have the right to have this information
  transmitted to another company, where it is technically feasible. To exercise
  these rights, please contact us as specified in the
How to Contact Us
section below.
If you are located in Brazil you also may have the right to: (1) obtain confirmation that we process your personal information; (2) access your information; (3) correct incomplete, inaccurate or outdated information; (4) have certain information anonymized, blocked or erased; (5) obtain your personal information in a portable format; (6) erase personal information processed with your consent; (7) obtain information about third parties with whom your personal information has been shared; (8) obtain information about the possibility of refusing to provide consent and the corresponding consequences; and (9) withdraw your consent to the extent we have relied on such consent to process your personal information.
Depending on your location, you may have the right to file a complaint with a
  privacy regulator if you are not satisfied with our response.
If you are a California consumer, for more information about your privacy
  rights, please see the section of this Privacy Policy called “California
  Consumer Privacy Statement.”
Other Online Services And Third-Party Features
Our Services may provide links to other online services and websites for your
  convenience and information, and may include third-party features such as
  apps, tools, widgets and plug-ins (e.g., Facebook, Google , Instagram,
  LinkedIn, Pinterest, Twitter, YouTube, and Shopify). These services, websites, and
  third-party features may operate independently from us. The privacy practices
  of these third parties, including details on the information they may collect
  about you, are subject to the privacy statements of these parties, which we
  strongly suggest you review. To the extent any linked online services or
  third-party features are not owned or controlled by us, iHerb is not
  responsible for these third parties’ information practices.
Retention Of Personal Information
To the extent required by applicable law, we keep the personal
  information you provide for the duration of our relationship, plus a reasonable period to
  comply with the applicable statute of limitations or if otherwise required
  under applicable law.
How We Protect Personal Information
We maintain administrative, technical and physical safeguards designed to
  protect personal information we obtain through the Services against
  accidental, unlawful or unauthorized destruction, loss, alteration, access,
  disclosure or use.
Children’s Personal Information
The Services are designed for a general audience and are not directed to
  children under the age of 16. iHerb does not knowingly collect or solicit
  personal information from children under the age of 16 through the Services.
  If we learn that we have collected personal information from a child under the
  age of 16, we will promptly delete that information from our records. If you
  believe that a child under the age of 16 may have provided us with personal
  information, please contact us as specified in the
How to Contact Us
section of this Privacy Policy.
Updates To Our Privacy Policy
This Privacy Policy may be updated periodically and without prior notice to
  you to reflect changes in our personal information practices. We will indicate
  at the top of the Privacy Policy when it was most recently updated.
How To Contact Us
If you would like to exercise your privacy rights, please contact us by using
this form
that will appear once you log in to your account.
  You can also
Email Us
or write us, using the contact details below if you wish to
  exercise these rights or if you have any questions about this Privacy Policy:
iHerb, LLC.
Attn: Legal Department
17400 Laguna Canyon Rd, Suite 400
Irvine, CA 92618, United States
If you are in the EEA, you can also write us at:
iHerb Netherlands B.V.
Schiphol Boulevard 359, 1118 BJ
Amsterdam Schiphol, Netherlands
If you are in the People's Republic of China, you can also write us at:
iHerb (Shanghai) Co. Ltd.
Floor 6, Building 4, No. 269 Tongxie Road
Changning District, Shanghai China, 200335
Subject to applicable law, data requests submitted by email or sent via postal
  mail may require that you provide additional documentation necessary to
  confirm your identity.
If you prefer not to provide additional documentation along with your request,
  we recommend you utilize the above
form
as it will automatically validate your
  identity.
California Consumer Privacy Statement
This California Consumer Privacy Statement (“Statement”) supplements the iHerb Privacy
  Policy
https://www.iherb.com/info/privacy
. It applies solely to California consumers and addresses personal
  information we collect online and offline. This Statement does not apply to
  iHerb personnel.
This California Consumer Privacy Statement uses certain terms that have the
  meaning given to them in the California Consumer Privacy Act of 2018 and its
  implementing regulations (the “CCPA”).
Notice of Collection and Use of Personal Information
We may collect (and may have collected during the 12-month period prior to the effective date of this Statement) the following categories of personal information about you:
Identifiers:
identifiers such as a real name, alias,
      postal address, unique personal identifier (such as a device identifier;
      cookies, beacons, pixel tags, mobile ad identifiers and similar
      technology; customer number, unique pseudonym, or user alias; telephone
      number and other forms of persistent or probabilistic identifiers), online
      identifier, internet protocol address, email address, account name, Social
      Security number, driver’s license number, passport number, and other
      similar identifiers
Additional Data Subject to Cal. Civ. Code § 1798.80:
signature, state identification card number, education, bank account
      number, credit card number, debit card number, and other financial
      information, and medical information
Protected Classifications:
characteristics of protected
      classifications under California or federal law, such as race, national
      origin, age, sex, gender, gender identity, marital status, medical
      condition, disability, citizenship status, and military and veteran status
Commercial Information:
commercial information, including
      records of personal property, products or services purchased, obtained, or
      considered, and other purchasing or consuming histories or tendencies
Online Activity:
Internet and other electronic network
      activity information, including, but not limited to, browsing history,
      search history, and information regarding your interaction with websites,
      applications or advertisements
Geolocation Data
Sensory Information:
audio, electronic, visual and
      similar information
Employment Information:
professional or
      employment-related information
Inferences:
inferences drawn from any of the information
      identified above to create a profile about you reflecting your
      preferences, characteristics, psychological trends, predispositions,
      behavior, attitudes, intelligence, abilities, and aptitudes.
We may use (and may have used during the 12-month period prior to the effective date of this Statement) your  personal information for the purposes described in our
Privacy Policy
and for the following business purposes specified in the CCPA:
Performing services, including maintaining or servicing accounts, providing customer service, processing or fulfilling orders and transactions, verifying customer information, processing payments, providing advertising or marketing services, providing analytics services, or providing similar services
Auditing related to a current interaction with you and concurrent transactions, including, but not limited to, counting ad impressions to unique visitors, verifying positioning and quality of ad impressions, and auditing compliance
Short-term, transient use, including, but not limited to, the contextual customization of ads shown as part of the same interaction
Detecting security incidents, protecting against malicious, deceptive, fraudulent, or illegal activity, and prosecuting those responsible for that activity
Debugging to identify and repair errors that impair existing intended functionality
Undertaking internal research for technological development and demonstration
Undertaking activities to verify or maintain the quality or safety of a service or device that is owned, manufactured, manufactured for, or controlled by us, and to improve, upgrade, or enhance the service or device that is owned, manufactured, manufactured for, or controlled by us.
Sources of Personal Information
We may have obtained personal information about you from various sources,
      as described below.
During the 12-month period prior to the effective date of this Statement, we may have obtained personal information about you from the following categories of sources:
Directly from you, such as when you make a purchase
From your devices, such as in connection with your use of the Services
Your family or friends in connection with their use of the Services, such as by sending information about our products directly to you
Our affiliates and subsidiaries
Vendors who provide services on our behalf
Social networks
Online advertising companies
Government entities
Sale of Personal Information
We do not sell your personal information in exchange for monetary
      compensation. We may allow certain third parties (such as certain
      advertising partners) to collect your personal information via automated
      technologies on our Services in exchange for non-monetary consideration
      (such as an enhanced ability to serve you content and advertisements that
      may be of interest to you). You have the right to opt out of this
      disclosure of your information, as detailed below.
During the 12-month period prior to the effective date of this Statement, we may have sold the following categories of
      personal information to online advertising services and advertising networks:
Identifiers
Protected Classifications
Commercial information
Online Activity
Inferences
We do not sell the personal information of minors under 16 years of age
      without affirmative authorization if we have actual knowledge of the
      individual’s age.
Sharing of Personal Information
During the 12-month period prior to the effective date of this Statement, we may have shared your personal information with certain categories of third parties, as described below.
We may have disclosed the following categories of personal information about you for a business purpose to the following categories of third parties:
Category of Personal Information
Category of Third Party
Identifiers
Our affiliates
Vendors who provide services on our behalf
Professional services organizations, such as auditors and law firms
Online advertising services and advertising  networks
Internet service providers
Data analytics providers
Operating systems and platforms
Social networks
Additional Data Subject to Cal. Civ. Code § 1798.80 Law
Our affiliates
Vendors who provide services on our behalf
Professional services organizations, such as auditors and law firms
Protected Classifications
Our affiliates
Vendors who provide services on our behalf
Professional services organizations, such as auditors and law firms
Online advertising services and advertising  networks
Internet service providers
Data analytics providers
Commercial Information
Our affiliates
Vendors who provide services on our behalf
Professional services organizations, such as auditors and law firms
Online advertising services and advertising  networks
Internet service providers
Data analytics providers
Online Activity
Our affiliates
Vendors who provide services on our behalf
Professional services organizations, such as auditors and law firms
Online advertising services and advertising  networks
Internet service providers
Data analytics providers
Operating systems and platforms
Social networks
Geolocation data
Our affiliates
Vendors who provide services on our behalf
Professional services organizations, such as auditors and law firms
Online advertising services and advertising  networks
Internet service providers
Data analytics providers
Operating systems and platforms
Social networks
Sensory Information
Our affiliates
Vendors who provide services on our behalf
Professional services organizations, such as auditors and law firms
Online advertising services and advertising  networks
Internet service providers
Data analytics providers
Operating systems and platforms
Social networks
Employment Information
Our affiliates
Vendors who provide services on our behalf
Professional services organizations, such as auditors and law firms
Internet service providers
Inferences
Our affiliates
Vendors who provide services on our behalf
Professional services organizations, such as auditors and law firms
Online advertising services and advertising  networks
Internet service providers
Data analytics providers
Operating systems and platforms
Social networks
In addition to the categories of third parties identified above, during the 12-month period prior to the effective date of this Statement, we may have shared personal information about you with government entities.
California Consumer Privacy Rights
You have certain choices regarding our use and disclosure of your personal
    information, as described below.
Access:
You have the right to request, twice in a 12-month period,
      that we disclose to you the personal information we have collected, used,
      disclosed and sold about you during the past 12 months.
Deletion:
You have the right to request that we delete certain
      personal information we have collected from you.
Opt-Out of Sale:
You have the right to opt-out of the sale of your
      personal information.
Shine the Light Request:
You also may have the right to request
      that we provide you with (a) a list of certain categories of personal
      information we have disclosed to third parties for their direct marketing
      purposes during the immediately preceding calendar year and (b) the
      identity of those third parties.
How to Submit a Request:
To submit an access or deletion
    request,
click here
or
Email Us
. To submit a Shine the Light request,
Email Us
. To
    opt-out of the sale of your personal information,
click here
or
Email Us
.
To submit a request as an authorized agent on behalf of a consumer, please
Email Us
.
Verifying Requests:
To help protect your privacy and
    maintain security, we will take steps to verify your identity before
    granting you access to your personal information or complying with your
    request. If you have an account with us, we verify your identity by
    requiring you to sign in to your account. If you do not have an account with
    us and you request access to or deletion of your personal information, there
    is no reasonable method by which we can verify your identity to the level of
    certainty required by the CCPA. The reason for this is that iHerb
    historically has not linked IP addresses, device identifiers or other
    information collected by automated means to named actual persons.
    Accordingly, if you do not have an account with us, and you request access
    to or deletion of your personal information, we will not be able to process
    your request at this time.
Additional Information:
If you choose to exercise
    any of your rights under the CCPA, you have the right to not receive
    discriminatory treatment by us. To the extent permitted by applicable law,
    we may charge a reasonable fee to comply with your request.
For questions or concerns about our privacy policies and practices, please contact us as described in the
How To Contact Us
section of our Privacy Policy.
Sub-section Policy: 
Sub-policy 0
https://careers.iherb.com/global/en/privacy-policy:
-
iHerb: Employee Privacy Notice
Effective Date: January 1, 2023
iHerb Holdings, LLC and its subsidiaries, affiliates, and related entities, including, but not limited to iHerb, LLC and iHerb Netherlands B.V. (collectively, “iHerb” or “we”), respect your concerns about privacy and are committed to protecting the privacy and security of your personal information. This Privacy Notice describes the types of personal information we collect from you as an employee or job applicant, how we secure and use your personal information,, with whom we may share it, and the choices and rights available to you regarding our use of the information. The Privacy Notice also describes the measures we take to safeguard the personal information, how long we
retain it and how you can contact us about our privacy practices and to exercise your rights. The entity that is mainly responsible for this information (i.e., the data controller) is the iHerb subsidiary that employs you or for which you apply for a job.
For the purposes of this notice:
”employee” refers to all employees, directors, officers and Board members of iHerb.  It also refers to consultants, independent contractors, contingent workers, and interns engaged by iHerb, even though they are not otherwise employees.
“job applicant” refers to individuals who have submitted information to iHerb (e.g. resume or job application) in order to apply to be an iHerb employee.
This notice is not intended and shall not be read to create any express or implied promise or contract for employment, for any benefit, or for specific treatment in specific situations. Nothing in this Privacy Notice should be construed to interfere with iHerb’s ability to process employee data for purposes of complying with our legal obligations or investigating alleged misconduct or violations of company policy or law, subject to compliance with local law. To the extent that this Privacy Notice conflicts with local law, local law controls.
Also, this Privacy Notice does not cover your use of iHerb Services as a consumer. To learn more about privacy for iHerb consumers, please read our iHerb
Privacy Policy
.
Information We Obtain
The types of personal information we obtain from job applicants and employees during the recruitment, onboarding and personal information update processes, may include:
Identification information, such as name, gender, photograph, date of birth, employee identification number);
Contact information, such as email and postal address, phone number for you and your reference, beneficiary, dependent, and emergency contact details);
Employment information, such as job title/position, office location, hire dates, employment contracts, performance and disciplinary records, grievance procedures, sickness/holiday records, wage and benefit information, compensation history, performance information, insurance enrollment information;
Educational and professional background, such as your resume or CV, prior employment details, performance-related information (e.g., evaluations and training), talent management information (e.g., education details, certifications, professional associations, skills, and awards and other achievements), historical compensation details, and references;
National identifiers, such as national ID/passport, immigration status and documentation, visas, social security numbers (US only), national insurance numbers;
Spouse, beneficiary and dependents information, marital status;
Financial information, such as banking details, tax information, payroll information, withholding, salary, benefits, expenses, company allowances, stock and equity grants;
IT information, including information required to provide access to iHerb’s IT systems and networks such as IP addresses, log files, login information, software/hardware inventories;
Health information, such as information about short- or long-term disabilities or illnesses that you might share with your HRBP or manager, particularly in relation to any leave of absence you may need to take;
Biometric information, such as fingerprints, facial recognition information, voice collected (if any) through time and attendance equipment or security systems, such as security badge scans, and any on-premise video monitoring of iHerb-sensitive facilities and locations for which further notice is provided;
Pre-employment screening and background check information, including criminal records data (for vetting purposes, where permissible and in accordance with applicable law); and
Any other information you choose to share with us (e.g., cover letter, photograph, articles, hobbies, social preferences, future career interests, comments, etc.).
We may obtain this information directly from you, when you apply for a job with iHerb on our careers site and/or when you are hired and throughout your employment with iHerb. We also may obtain the above information from third parties, such as recruiters who submit it to us on your behalf, from your social media profile on LinkedIn or other similar services, or when we perform background checks that are necessary for the role to be performed by the employee.  In most circumstances, we will get your permission before we collect personal information about you from a third party.
The information we request as part of the job application process is necessary to enter into a possible employment contract. Failure to provide this information may prevent us from evaluating or otherwise processing your application.
We may also collect certain demographic data that qualifies as sensitive personal information, such as race, ethnicity, sexual orientation, veteran status, and disability to help us understand the diversity of our workforce.  This information, when collected, is generally done so on a voluntary consensual basis, and employee and job applicants are not required to provide this information, unless it is necessary for us to collect such information to comply with our legal obligations.  If you are a U.S. resident, we also may ask for certain demographic information, such as your gender, ethnic background, veteran status and disability status. Providing this information is optional and is not required to apply for a job with iHerb. This personal information will not be considered in evaluating applicants’ qualifications for employment with iHerb.
If you are an employee, we process personal information about you (and your dependents, beneficiaries and other individuals associated with your employment) primarily for managing our employment relationship with you and managing your interactions with workplace facilities/information systems.
If you are a former employee, we process personal information about you primarily for legal compliance.
We will use your personal information only for the purposes for which it was collected, unless we reasonably need it for another compatible purpose and there is a legal basis for further processing. For example, relying upon our legitimate interest in recruiting candidates for roles at iHerb, we may process the personal information you provided while researching job openings. However, once you apply for and are successful in obtaining a role, we may process your personal information for the purpose of entering into an employment relationship with you.
If we ask you to provide any other personal information not described above that is necessary for the execution and performance of employment contract or the management of human resources in accordance with company policies, then the personal information we will ask you to provide, and the reason why we ask you to provide it, will be made clear to you at the point we collect it.
How We Use the Information About You
We use the information we obtain to manage our employment or contractual relationship with you, along with other business purposes.  Such uses include:
evaluating and assessing your application and otherwise managing career opportunities with iHerb, including the verification of references and qualifications and, where permitted by law, administering background checks;
administering payroll and benefits as well as processing employee work-related claims (e.g. worker compensation, insurance claims, etc.) and leave of absence requests;
establishing training and/or development requirements;
reviewing work performance and determining performance requirements;
disciplinary actions or termination;
establishing emergency contacts and responding to emergencies;
complying with laws and regulations (e.g. labor and employment laws, health and safety, tax, anti-discrimination laws), under judicial authorization, or to exercise or defend legal rights;
compiling internal directores, such as employee directories;
to detect fraud or other types of wrongdoing;
IT security and administration;
to protect the life and safety of employees and others; and
for other legitimate purposes reasonably required for day-to-day operations, such as accounting, financial reporting, staff augmentation and business planning.
We also use your information if we have a legitimate interest to do so, including staffing open positions at iHerb. For example, if your application for employment is not accepted, we may keep your information so we can inform you of future job openings at iHerb. You can always opt-out from the communication concerning future job openings by clicking on the unsubscribe link within the email you receive from us or by contacting us as indicated below.
We may also use such information to conduct internal analyses to understand job applicants who apply; to improve our recruitment process, including our diversity and equal opportunities efforts; and to comply with our legal obligations (e.g. health, safety, and anti-discrimination laws). We may also combine the information we collect or remove pieces of information to limit or prevent identification of any particular individual and use such information for internal research and operational purposes.
When we process sensitive information about you, we will ensure that one or more of the lawful bases for processing sensitive information applies, for example, processing necessary to satisfy our obligation in relation to employment law, processing related to data you have made public (e.g., if you tell us that you are ill), and processing which is necessary for the purpose of establishing, making, or defending legal claims. If you have questions about the nature of our processing or the lawful bases for which we do so, please contact us using the contact details provided below.
To the extent that we use processes that involve automated decision making or profiling when processing your personal information, we take steps to ensure that any automated decision-making or profiling practices are fair and not discriminatory.
We may also use your personal information for other lawful purposes which we will tell you about, and provided that we get your consent to that use, if required by law to do so.
Information We Obtain by Automated Means
We obtain certain information by automated means when you visit our careers site, such as cookies, web beacons, server logs and other technologies. The information we obtain in this manner may include your device IP address, domain name, identifiers associated with your devices, device and operating system type and characteristics, web browser characteristics, language preferences, clickstream data, your interactions with our careers site (such as the web pages you visit, links you click and features you use), the pages that led or referred you to our careers site, dates and times of access to the site, and other information about your use of the site.
These technologies help us: (1) remember your information so you will not have to re-enter it; (2) track and understand how you use and interact with our careers site; (3) tailor the careers site around your preferences; (4) measure the usability of our careers site and the effectiveness of our communications; and (5) otherwise manage and enhance our careers site and help ensure it is working properly.  To the extent required by applicable law, we will obtain your consent before placing cookies or similar technologies on your computer. For more information about cookies we use and to manage your cookie preferences, please click on the "Cookie Preferences" icon at the bottom of each page of our careers site. You can manage cookies through your web browser. Most browsers will tell you how to stop accepting new cookies, how to be notified when you receive a new cookie, and how to disable existing cookies. You can find out how to do this for your particular browser by clicking “help” on your browser’s menu or by visiting www.allaboutcookies.org. Please note, however, that without cookies you may not be able to take full advantage of all our careers site features.
Information Sharing
We may share your personal information with other iHerb subsidiaries, employees, contractors, consultants and service providers who require the data to assist iHerb to establish, manage or terminate your employment with iHerb and for the purposes described in this Privacy Notice. We also may share the personal information with our service providers who perform services on our behalf based on our instructions, including, but not limited to, employee benefit plan providers, payroll support services, employee travel management services, our service provider that operates the careers site on our behalf, and recruitment marketing agencies. We do not authorize our service providers to use or disclose the information except as necessary to perform services on our behalf or comply with legal requirements.  We may be required to share personal information when we contact your previous or current employer, with your authorization, to verify your employment history or your references.
Some of these recipients may be located in countries other than the country in which the information originally was collected. Those countries may not have the same data protection laws as the country in which you initially provided the information.
If you are located in the European Economic Area (“EEA”), the United Kingdom (“UK”) or Switzerland, your personal information will be transferred to iHerb and its service providers in the United States. U.S. laws have not been recognized by the European Commission as providing for an adequate level of data protection. When we transfer your information to recipients in other countries (such as the U.S.), we will protect that information as described in this Privacy Notice and will comply with applicable legal requirements providing adequate protection for the transfer of personal information to recipients in countries other than the one in which you provided the information, including by implementing appropriate safeguards based on the European Commission’s Standard Contractual Clauses. Subject to applicable law, you may obtain a copy of these safeguards by contacting us as indicated in the How to Contact Us section below.
If you are located in China, Japan, the Republic of Korea (South Korea) or anywhere else in the world, your personal information will be transferred to iHerb and its service providers in the United States. iHerb uses and requires its service providers to use appropriate privacy and security measures designed to protect your personal information and that, in such cases, the service providers have adopted and are handling your personal information to a standard that is not lower than your entitlement under your country’s data privacy, data protection and data security laws. Subject to applicable law, you may obtain a copy of these safeguards by contacting us as indicated in the How to Contact Us section below.
In addition, we may disclose personal information about you (1) if we are required to do so by law or legal process (such as a court order), (2) for the purposes of, or in connection with, any legal proceedings, or otherwise for the purposes of establishing, exercising or defending any legal rights, including, but not limited to, seeking legal advice from external lawyers and other advice from other professionals such as accountants, management consultants, etc.; (3) in response to a request by law enforcement authorities, (4) when we believe disclosure is necessary or appropriate to prevent physical harm or financial loss or in connection with an investigation of suspected or actual illegal activity, (6) in the event we sell or transfer all or a portion of our business or assets (including in the event of a reorganization, dissolution or liquidation); or (7) otherwise with your consent.  Note that where legal requirements limit the sharing of your personal information, iHerb will respect such requirements.
Retention of Personal Information
Except as otherwise permitted or required by applicable law or regulation, we will only retain your personal information for as long as necessary to fulfill the purposes we collected it for, as required to satisfy any legal, accounting, or reporting obligations, or as necessary to resolve disputes, and as documented in our data retention policy. To determine the appropriate retention period for personal information, we consider applicable legal requirements, the amount, nature, and sensitivity of the personal information, the potential risk of harm from unauthorized use or disclosure of your personal information, the purposes we process your personal information for, and whether we can achieve those purposes through other means. We specify the retention periods for your personal information in our data retention policy.
Under some circumstances we may aggregate and de-identify your personal information so that it can no longer be associated with you. We reserve the right to use such aggregated, anonymous and/or de-identified information for any legitimate business purpose without further notice to you or your consent, subject to applicable law. Once you are no longer an employee of the company, we will retain and securely destroy your personal information in accordance with our document retention policy and applicable laws and regulations.
How We Protect Personal Information
We maintain administrative, technical and physical safeguards designed to protect personal information we obtain against accidental, unlawful or unauthorized destruction, loss, alteration, access, disclosure or use.
Your Rights and Choices
To the extent provided by applicable law, you may: (1) request access to the personal information we maintain about you; (2) request that we update, correct, amend, or erase your information; or (3) request the restriction of our use of your personal information, by contacting us as specified in the “How to Contact Us” section below.
EU/EEA & UK
If you are located in the EEA and the UK, you also may object to the use of your personal information in certain situations in which we use that information based on our legitimate interests, as described above. In addition, to the extent provided by applicable law, you may receive, in a structured, commonly used and machine-readable format, your personal information you have provided to us based on a contract. You have the right to have this information transmitted to another company, where it is technically feasible. To exercise these rights, please contact us as specified in the “How to Contact Us” section below. Depending on your location, you may have the right to file a complaint with a privacy regulator if you are not satisfied with our response.
California
If you are an employee, former employee or job applicant that resides in California, the California Privacy Rights Act (“CPRA”) applies to you and provides specific rights regarding your personal information under California law. This section applies to you and explains your rights under the CPRA and this Privacy Notice.
Please note that in the preceding twelve (12) months, we have not sold your personal information or shared such information for cross context behavioral advertising. We may disclose certain personal information, such as your first and last name, employee identification number, email address, bank account details, job title/position, and other similar contact data, financial information, and employment details with our subsidiaries and affiliates and other third parties, including service providers who provide services on behalf of iHerb.
Only you or an authorized agent that you authorize to act on your behalf may make a verifiable request related to your personal information. Any verifiable request (including those to delete data) must provide sufficient information that allows us to reasonably verify you are the person about whom we collected personal information or an authorized representative (such as by requiring you to provide a signed written authorization that the agent is authorized to make a request on your behalf) and describe your request with sufficient detail that allows us to properly understand, evaluate, and respond to it. We cannot respond to your request or provide you with personal information if we cannot verify your identity or authority to make the request and confirm the personal information relates to you; however, making a verifiable request does not require you to create an account with us.
You may request:
Notice of and access to certain information about our collection and use of your personal information over the past 12 months. Once we receive and confirm your verifiable request, we may disclose to you the categories of personal information we collected about you; the categories of sources for the personal information we collected about you; our business or commercial purpose for collecting that personal information; the categories of third parties with whom we disclosed that personal information; the specific pieces of personal information we collected about you (also called a data portability request); and if we disclosed your personal information for a business purpose, a list of disclosures identifying the personal information categories that each category of recipient obtained.
Correction of personal information about you that is inaccurate.
Deletion of your personal information that we collected from you and retained, subject to certain exceptions. Once we receive and confirm your verifiable request, we will delete or de-identify (and direct our service providers to delete or de-identify) your personal information from our records, unless an exception applies.
California residents who are employees, former employees, or job applicants may make requests regarding their personal information by submitting a request as described in the How To Contact Us section below. There may be circumstances in which we are required or permitted under applicable law not to address your request. We will not penalize you for exercising any of your rights where prohibited by law.
​​​How To Contact Us
You can use the contact details below if you ish to exercise these rights or if you have any questions about this Privacy Notice:
iHerb, LLC
Attn: Legal Department
17400 Laguna Canyon Road, Suite 400
Irvine, CA 92603, United States
privacy@iherb.com
If you are in the EU, you can write us at:
iHerb Netherlands B.V.
Schiphol Boulevard 359, 1118 BJ
Amsterdam Schiphol, Netherlands
privacy@iherb.com
Alternatively, you may also raise any questions or concerns directly with your manager, a member of the HR team, or through the Legal/Privacy team.
b8747f31589844c9a300241a8f329650
Sub-policy 1
http://www.google.com/analytics/learn/privacy:
marketingplatform.google.com uses cookies from Google to deliver and enhance the quality of its services and to analyze traffic.
Learn more
.
OK, got it
Google is committed to advancing racial equity for Black communities.
See how.
Faster, smarter marketing
Introducing Google Marketing Platform, a unified advertising and analytics platform for smarter marketing and better results.
Sign in to Google Marketing Platform
Sign in to Google Marketing Platform
Easy-to-use tools for small businesses
Get free tools to make the most of your marketing, from site and app analytics to intuitive testing and more.
See small-business solutions
Advanced solutions for large enterprises
Make deeper customer connections to drive better marketing results with a complete set of advertising and analytics solutions.
See enterprise solutions
Our Adidas teams
work together in one environment
where we can see audience insights, what creative we’re running and where, how it’s performing, and make changes almost in real time.
Chris Murphy
,
          Head of Digital Experience,
              Adidas
GMP_Logo_analytics
Analytics
Understand your customers so you can deliver better experiences.
Learn more about Analytics
Analytics
Understand your customers so you can deliver better experiences.
Tag Manager
Manage all your tags without editing code.
Campaign Manager 360
Get a complete view of all your digital media campaigns.
Display & Video 360
Reach today’s always-connected audiences wherever they are.
Search Ads 360
Get real-time data and unified insights for your search campaigns.
1
Bain report: How top brands grow with timely customer connections.
New research from Bain shows how leading marketers are using platform integrations and technology to boost customer engagement by delivering more relevant experiences in the moment.
Read more
Case Study
Deckers Brands drives business growth with Google Marketing Platform and Google Cloud
Read more
Feature Brief
Control how data is used in Google Analytics
Read more
Guide
Meeting the data challenge with Google Marketing Platform and Google Cloud
Read more
1
See all resources
Let’s partner up.
Whether you’re looking for help with a single project or a bigger, long-term partnership, Google Marketing Platform Partners have the resources and expertise you need to help you achieve more with your marketing.
Find a partner
Help when you need it.
We’re here to support you every step of the way, whether you use a single product or the entire Google Marketing Platform.
Get support
Sub-policy 2
https://www.iherb.com/info/privacy:
Your preference has been updated for this session. To permanently change your account setting, go to
My Account
As a reminder, you can update you preferred country or language anytime in
My Account
>
iherblogo
beauty2
heart-circle
sports-fitness
food-nutrition
herbs-supplements
pageview
Home
Privacy Policy | iHerb
Privacy Policy | iHerb
iHerb Privacy Policy
Effective Date: August 5, 2021
iHerb, LLC. and its subsidiaries, including iHerb Netherlands B.V. (
collectively
, “iHerb”), respect your
  concerns about privacy. This Privacy Policy describes the types of personal
  information we collect about individuals through our website and mobile apps
  (collectively, the “Services”), how we may use the information, with whom we
  may share it, and the choices available regarding our use of the information.
  The Privacy Policy also describes the measures we take to safeguard the
  personal information, how long we retain it and how individuals can contact us
  about our privacy practices and to exercise their rights.
Click on one of the links below to jump to the listed section:
Country-specific Privacy Policies
Information We Obtain
How We Use The Information We Obtain
Automated Collection Of Data
Information Sharing
Data Transfers
Your Rights And Choices
Other Online Services And Third-Party Features
Retention Of Personal Information
How We Protect Personal Information
Children’s Personal Information
Updates To Our Privacy Policy
How To Contact Us
California Consumer Privacy Statement
Country-specific Privacy Policies
Data protection and privacy rules differ worldwide. For this reason, and in certain cases we have to change our privacy practices due to specific legal requirements  in countries where we do our business.
This document may include some information specific for certain categories of users, for example, residents of California. In addition, we can also elaborate separate Privacy Policies, where our data protection and privacy practices differ from the ones described in this document due to local legal requirements.
Russia/Kazakhstan
Korea
In addition, if you apply for a job with us, please see our
Career’s Privacy Notice
.
Information We Obtain
In connection with your use of the Services, you may provide personal
  information to us in various ways. The types of personal information we obtain
  include:
contact information (such as name, email address, shipping address and instructions, postal
    code, telephone number, and personal ID);
login credentials to create an account on the Services (such as email
    address and password);
information contained on your social media public profile, to the extent you
    decide to create an account on the Services using your social media account;
information you choose to submit on your personalized public profile “My
    Page”, including web address name, user name, photograph, links to your
    social media accounts and any other information you choose to submit on the
    “Page Description” section of your “My Page”;
user generated content related to product reviews, comments, questions and
    answers;
payment information, such as name, billing address, account number, and
    payment card details (including card number, expiration date and security
    code) for payments processed by us. To the extent any payments are processed
    by any other third parties such as PayPal or Apple Pay, then the privacy
    policies of those parties shall govern such information;
bank account and tax information related to any company programs that may
    offer customer payouts (such as Rewards program);
order history, including information about products purchased or viewed on
    the Services;
details you provide through contests, sweepstakes and surveys;
social media information, such as social media handles, content and other
    data shared with us through third-party features that you use on our
    Services (such as apps, tools, payment services, widgets and plugins offered
    by social media services like Facebook, Google , Instagram, LinkedIn,
    Pinterest, Twitter and YouTube) or posted on social media pages (such as our
    social media pages or other pages accessible to us);
other personal information contained in content you submit on the Services,
    such as through our “Contact Us” feature or other customer support tools;
    and
Country/region and language preference based on mobile device settings
    and/or IP;
IP address, device, operating system, and browser information that we
    detect.
You are not required to provide this information but, if you choose not to do
  so, we may not be able to offer you certain Services and related features.
How We Use The Information We Obtain
We will use the information we obtain through the Services as needed to
  fulfill our contractual obligation to provide you with the products and
  services you request and to deliver products ordered (including, but not limited
  to, transportation and customs clearance through related third party service
  providers).
We also will use the information we obtain through the Services if we have a
  legitimate interest to do so, including to support the following functions and
  activities:
establishing and managing your account;
communicating with you about your account or transactions and sending you
    information about features and enhancements;
processing claims in connection with our products and services, and keeping
    you informed about the status of your order;
managing our Rewards and loyalty programs;
posting your product reviews and managing our Reviews program;
improving and customizing your experience with the Services, including
    providing recommendations based on your preferences;
identifying and authenticating you so you may use the Services;
marketing our products to you and providing you with promotions, including
    special deals, coupons, discounts and chances to win contests;
communicating with you about, and administering your participation in,
    contests, sweepstakes or surveys;
responding to your requests and inquiries and providing customer support, such as through our chatbot or other customer support tools;
operating, evaluating and improving our business (including developing new
    services; enhancing and improving our Services; managing our communications;
    analyzing our user base and Services; performing data analytics and market
    research; and performing accounting, auditing and other internal functions);
protecting against, identifying and preventing fraud and other criminal
    activity, claims and other liabilities;
complying with and enforcing applicable legal requirements, relevant
    industry standards and our policies, including this Privacy Policy and
    iHerb’s
Terms of Use
,
Rewards Program Terms of Use
; and
communicating with you about changes to our policies.
In addition, we will use your contact information to send you Health
  Newsletters, emails, SMS, push notifications and in-app notifications about our
  products, services, sales and special offers if you sign up to receive them
  and have not opted out. We also may use your email address to display ads for our products, services, sales and special offers through Facebook’s and Google’s sites or networks. For example, if you are on Facebook, you may see our ads on the social media platform, or if you sign in to your Google account, you may see our ads as you use the Google search engine, Instagram, Facebook, Facebook Audience Network, YouTube, Gmail, and the Google Display Network because these third parties will match your email address with you. To the extent provided by applicable law, you can object at any time to the use of your e-mail address for advertising purposes as specified in the
Rights And Choices
section below.
We may combine information we obtain about you through our websites with the
  information obtained through our apps for the purposes described above. We
  also may use the information we obtain in other ways for which we provide
  specific notice at the time of collection or otherwise with your consent.
Automated Collection Of Data
When you use our Services or open our emails, we may obtain certain
  information by automated means, such as browser cookies, Flash cookies, local storage, web
  beacons and pixels, JavaScript, device identifiers, server logs and other technologies. The
  information we obtain in this manner may include your device IP address,
  domain name, identifiers associated with your devices, device and operating
  system type and characteristics, web browser characteristics, language
  preferences, clickstream data, your interactions with our Services (such as
  the web pages you visit, links you click and features you use), the pages that
  led or referred you to our Services, dates and times of access to our
  Services, and other information about your use of our Services. We also may
  receive your device’s geolocation and other information related to your
  location through GPS, Bluetooth, WiFi signals and other technologies for
  certain purposes listed above, such as to provide you with our Services. Your
  device may provide you with a notification when the Services attempt to
  collect your precise geolocation.
A “cookie” is a text file that websites send to a visitor’s computer or other
  Internet-connected device to uniquely identify the visitor’s browser or to
  store information or settings in the browser. Cookies may be set either directly by the website a user is visiting (“first-party cookies”), or by a domain other than the website the user is visiting (“third-party cookies”). A “Flash cookie,” also known as
  a local shared object, functions like a web cookie to personalize a user’s
  experience on sites that use Adobe Flash Player. A “web beacon,” also known as
  an Internet tag, pixel tag or clear GIF, links web pages to web servers and
  their cookies and may be used to transmit information collected through
  cookies back to a web server. We and our third-party service providers may use
  beacons in emails to help us track response rates, identify when our emails
  are accessed or forwarded, and for other purposes listed above.
The following types of cookies and similar technologies are used on the
  Services:
Necessary Cookies
We use necessary cookies to help enable the Services to function, including
  to (1) identify you once you have logged in to your account, (2) keep track of preferences you specify while you use the Services, and (3) manage the security of the Services.
Functionality Cookies
Our Services also use cookies to personalize the content of the Services based on your use of the Services, and support certain third-party services to provide enhanced functionality, such as to enable videos posted on the Services from YouTube. These features use third-party cookies (e.g., You Tube cookies) that are placed directly on your device by the third-party services. The privacy practices of these third parties, including details on the information they may collect about you, are subject to the privacy notices of these parties, which we strongly suggest you review.
Analytics Cookies
Through our Services, we may obtain personal information about your online activities over time and across third-party apps, websites, devices and other online services. On our Services, we use third-party online analytics services, such as those of Google Analytics. The service providers that administer these analytics services use automated technologies to collect data (such as email address, IP addresses, cookies and other device identifiers) to evaluate, for example, use of our Services and to diagnose technical issues. To learn more about Google Analytics, please visit
http://www.google.com/analytics/learn/privacy
, and to opt out of being tracked by Google Analytics across all websites, please visit:
http://tools.google.com/dlpage/gaoptout
. In addition, our Services use FullStory analytics cookies and similar technologies (local storage) to collect technical information from your device (such as IP address, device and operating system type, browser and approximate geographic location based on your device IP address), as well as information about your interactions with our Services (such as clickstream, browsing and keystroke data, and  the referring URL and session duration). This information allows us to recreate your sessions so we can get a better understanding of how you use our Services, troubleshoot issues, and administer and improve our Services.
Personalized Advertising Cookies
Through our Services, both we and certain third parties may collect
  information about your online activities to provide you with advertising about
  products and services tailored to your individual interests. You may see our
  ads on other websites or mobile apps because we participate in advertising
  networks. Ad networks allow us to target our messaging to users considering
  demographic data, users’ inferred interests and browsing context. These
  networks track users’ online activities over time by collecting information
  through automated means, including through the use of browser cookies, web
  beacons, device identifiers, server logs, web beacons and other similar
  technologies. The networks use this information to show ads that may be
  tailored to individuals’ interests, to track users’ browsers or devices across
  multiple websites and apps, and to build a profile of users’ online browsing
  and app usage activities. The information our ad networks may collect includes
  data about users’ visits to websites and apps that participate in the relevant
  ad networks, such as the pages or ads viewed and the actions taken on the
  websites or apps. This data collection takes place both on our Services and on
  third-party websites and apps that participate in the ad networks. This
  process also helps us track the effectiveness of our marketing efforts.
To learn how to opt out of ad network interest-based advertising in the U.S.,
  please visit
www.aboutads.info/choices
and
http://www.networkadvertising.org/choices/
. In the European Union, please visit
www.youronlinechoices.eu
.
If you are located in the European Economic Area (“EEA”) or the United Kingdom (“UK”), Russia or Kazakhstan, you can learn more on our use of cookies and similar technologies, including the companies using cookies on our Services, the individual cookies used and their duration, by clicking on the “Cookie Preferences” icon at the bottom of each page of our Services.
How to Change Your Cookie Settings
To the extent required by applicable law, we will obtain your consent before placing non-essential cookies or similar technologies on your device, and keep your choice for a period of six (6) months. If you are located in the European Economic Area (“EEA”) or the United Kingdom (“UK”), Russia or Kazakhstan, you can change your cookie preferences at any time by clicking on the “Cookie Preferences” icon at the bottom of each page of our Services.
You also can stop certain types of cookies from being downloaded on your device by selecting the appropriate settings on your web browser. Most web browsers will tell you how to stop accepting new browser cookies, how to be notified when you receive a new browser cookie and how to disable existing cookies. The following external links will explain how to manage cookies for the most common browsers:
Google Chrome
Microsoft Edge
Mozilla Firefox
Microsoft Internet Explorer
Opera
Apple Safari
To find out how to manage cookies for other browsers, please click “help” on your browser’s menu or visit www.allaboutcookies.org. [Flash cookies typically cannot be controlled, deleted or disabled through your browser settings and instead must be managed through your Adobe Flash Player settings. To manage Flash cookies, which we may use on our website from time to time, you can go to the Adobe Flash Player Support page available here. In addition, your mobile device settings may allow you to prohibit mobile app platforms (such as Apple and Google) from sharing certain information obtained by automated means with app developers and operators such as us. Our Services are not designed to respond to “do not track” signals received from browsers. Please note that without cookies or other automated tools we use to collect this type of data, you may not be able to use all the features of our Services.
Chatbot Logs
Our Services also use a chatbot to provide automated customer assistance. A chatbot is a computer program that communicates with you, using text on a digital message interface and artificial intelligence. Put simply, if you ask a question through our chatbot, the chatbot will reply to you in human-ish behavior. Our chatbot is supported by Ada Support, a third-party chatbot service provider located in Canada, who performs services on our behalf (“Ada”). Ada uses an automated decision making process, when deciding on the correct answer to serve based on your question, and will receive message logs and usernames when you interact with the chatbot. Message logs contain information such as details of your account with us, including your username, e-mail address, phone number and address, as well as any other content you choose to submit when you make a customer support inquiry through the chatbot. Ada will retain the content of those messages, together with responses to those messages and any outcome from those messages. This information will be retained for twelve (12) months and will be used only to provide customer support and improve the quality of the chatbot services. If you are located in the EEA, UK or Switzerland, the above information will be transferred to Ada in Canada - a country which has been recognized by the European Commission, UK and Swiss Administration as providing an adequate level of data protection.
Information Sharing
We do not disclose personal information we obtain about you, except as
  described in this Privacy Policy. We will share your personal information with
  our (1) subsidiaries and affiliates, and (2) third-party service providers who
  perform services on our behalf (such as website hosting, payment processing and authorization,
  order fulfillment, transportation, customs clearance, marketing, data
  analytics, customer support and fraud prevention) for the purposes described
  in this Privacy Policy. We do not authorize our service providers to use or
  disclose the information except as necessary to perform services on our behalf
  or comply with legal requirements.
We also may disclose information about you: (1) if we are required to do so by
  law or legal process (such as a court order or subpoena); (2) in response to
  requests by government agencies, such as law enforcement authorities; (3) to
  establish, exercise or defend our legal rights; (4) when we believe disclosure
  is necessary or appropriate to prevent physical or other harm or financial
  loss; (5) in connection with an investigation of suspected or actual illegal
  activity; (6) in the event we sell or transfer all or a portion of our
  business or assets (including in the event of a reorganization, dissolution or
  liquidation); or (7) otherwise with your consent.
Data Transfers
We may transfer the personal information we collect about you to recipients in
  countries other than the country in which the information originally was
  collected. Those countries may not have the same data protection laws as the
  country in which you initially provided the information. When we transfer your
  information to recipients in other countries (such as the U.S.), we will
  protect that information as described in this Privacy Policy and will comply
  with applicable legal requirements providing adequate protection for the
  transfer of personal information to recipients in countries other than the one
  in which you provided the information, including by selecting service providers that are located in a country recognized by the European Commission as providing an adequate level of data protection or by implementing appropriate safeguards based on the European Commission’s Standard Contractual Clauses, where applicable. Subject to applicable law, you may obtain a copy of these safeguards by contacting us as indicated in the
How to Contact Us
section below.
iHerb, LLC. is
  certified under the EU-U.S. and Swiss-U.S. Privacy Shield frameworks developed
  by the U.S. Department of Commerce, and the European Commission and Swiss
  Federal Data Protection and Information Commissioner, respectively.
Click here
to view our EU/Swiss-U.S. Privacy Shield Privacy Policy. As of July 16, 2020, we no longer rely on the Privacy Shield to transfer personal information to the U.S.
Your Rights And Choices
We offer you certain choices in connection with the personal information we
  obtain about you. For example, if you have created an account with us, you can
  change your communication preferences by logging into your account and
  clicking on “Communication Preferences”. To the extent provided by applicable
  law, you also can object to the use of your personal information for advertising or direct
  marketing purposes and unsubscribe from our marketing mailing lists by
  following the “Unsubscribe” link in our emails, texting STOP to the short code number from which our SMS are being sent or contacting us as specified
  in the
How to Contact Us
section below. We will apply
  your preferences going forward.
To the extent provided by applicable law, you may: (1) request access to the
  personal information we maintain about you; (2) request that we update,
  correct, amend, or erase your information; or (3) request the restriction of
  our use of your personal information, by contacting us as specified in the
How to Contact Us
section below.
If you are located in the EEA and the UK, to the extent provided by applicable law, you
  also may object to the use of your personal information in certain situations
  in which we use that information based on our legitimate interests, as
  described above. In addition, to the extent provided by applicable law, you
  may receive, in a structured, commonly used and machine-readable format, your
  personal information you have provided to us based on your consent or a
  contract to which you are party. You have the right to have this information
  transmitted to another company, where it is technically feasible. To exercise
  these rights, please contact us as specified in the
How to Contact Us
section below.
If you are located in Brazil you also may have the right to: (1) obtain confirmation that we process your personal information; (2) access your information; (3) correct incomplete, inaccurate or outdated information; (4) have certain information anonymized, blocked or erased; (5) obtain your personal information in a portable format; (6) erase personal information processed with your consent; (7) obtain information about third parties with whom your personal information has been shared; (8) obtain information about the possibility of refusing to provide consent and the corresponding consequences; and (9) withdraw your consent to the extent we have relied on such consent to process your personal information.
Depending on your location, you may have the right to file a complaint with a
  privacy regulator if you are not satisfied with our response.
If you are a California consumer, for more information about your privacy
  rights, please see the section of this Privacy Policy called “California
  Consumer Privacy Statement.”
Other Online Services And Third-Party Features
Our Services may provide links to other online services and websites for your
  convenience and information, and may include third-party features such as
  apps, tools, widgets and plug-ins (e.g., Facebook, Google , Instagram,
  LinkedIn, Pinterest, Twitter, YouTube, and Shopify). These services, websites, and
  third-party features may operate independently from us. The privacy practices
  of these third parties, including details on the information they may collect
  about you, are subject to the privacy statements of these parties, which we
  strongly suggest you review. To the extent any linked online services or
  third-party features are not owned or controlled by us, iHerb is not
  responsible for these third parties’ information practices.
Retention Of Personal Information
To the extent required by applicable law, we keep the personal
  information you provide for the duration of our relationship, plus a reasonable period to
  comply with the applicable statute of limitations or if otherwise required
  under applicable law.
How We Protect Personal Information
We maintain administrative, technical and physical safeguards designed to
  protect personal information we obtain through the Services against
  accidental, unlawful or unauthorized destruction, loss, alteration, access,
  disclosure or use.
Children’s Personal Information
The Services are designed for a general audience and are not directed to
  children under the age of 16. iHerb does not knowingly collect or solicit
  personal information from children under the age of 16 through the Services.
  If we learn that we have collected personal information from a child under the
  age of 16, we will promptly delete that information from our records. If you
  believe that a child under the age of 16 may have provided us with personal
  information, please contact us as specified in the
How to Contact Us
section of this Privacy Policy.
Updates To Our Privacy Policy
This Privacy Policy may be updated periodically and without prior notice to
  you to reflect changes in our personal information practices. We will indicate
  at the top of the Privacy Policy when it was most recently updated.
How To Contact Us
If you would like to exercise your privacy rights, please contact us by using
this form
that will appear once you log in to your account.
  You can also
Email Us
or write us, using the contact details below if you wish to
  exercise these rights or if you have any questions about this Privacy Policy:
iHerb, LLC.
Attn: Legal Department
17400 Laguna Canyon Rd, Suite 400
Irvine, CA 92618, United States
If you are in the EEA, you can also write us at:
iHerb Netherlands B.V.
Schiphol Boulevard 359, 1118 BJ
Amsterdam Schiphol, Netherlands
If you are in the People's Republic of China, you can also write us at:
iHerb (Shanghai) Co. Ltd.
Floor 6, Building 4, No. 269 Tongxie Road
Changning District, Shanghai China, 200335
Subject to applicable law, data requests submitted by email or sent via postal
  mail may require that you provide additional documentation necessary to
  confirm your identity.
If you prefer not to provide additional documentation along with your request,
  we recommend you utilize the above
form
as it will automatically validate your
  identity.
California Consumer Privacy Statement
This California Consumer Privacy Statement (“Statement”) supplements the iHerb Privacy
  Policy
https://www.iherb.com/info/privacy
. It applies solely to California consumers and addresses personal
  information we collect online and offline. This Statement does not apply to
  iHerb personnel.
This California Consumer Privacy Statement uses certain terms that have the
  meaning given to them in the California Consumer Privacy Act of 2018 and its
  implementing regulations (the “CCPA”).
Notice of Collection and Use of Personal Information
We may collect (and may have collected during the 12-month period prior to the effective date of this Statement) the following categories of personal information about you:
Identifiers:
identifiers such as a real name, alias,
      postal address, unique personal identifier (such as a device identifier;
      cookies, beacons, pixel tags, mobile ad identifiers and similar
      technology; customer number, unique pseudonym, or user alias; telephone
      number and other forms of persistent or probabilistic identifiers), online
      identifier, internet protocol address, email address, account name, Social
      Security number, driver’s license number, passport number, and other
      similar identifiers
Additional Data Subject to Cal. Civ. Code § 1798.80:
signature, state identification card number, education, bank account
      number, credit card number, debit card number, and other financial
      information, and medical information
Protected Classifications:
characteristics of protected
      classifications under California or federal law, such as race, national
      origin, age, sex, gender, gender identity, marital status, medical
      condition, disability, citizenship status, and military and veteran status
Commercial Information:
commercial information, including
      records of personal property, products or services purchased, obtained, or
      considered, and other purchasing or consuming histories or tendencies
Online Activity:
Internet and other electronic network
      activity information, including, but not limited to, browsing history,
      search history, and information regarding your interaction with websites,
      applications or advertisements
Geolocation Data
Sensory Information:
audio, electronic, visual and
      similar information
Employment Information:
professional or
      employment-related information
Inferences:
inferences drawn from any of the information
      identified above to create a profile about you reflecting your
      preferences, characteristics, psychological trends, predispositions,
      behavior, attitudes, intelligence, abilities, and aptitudes.
We may use (and may have used during the 12-month period prior to the effective date of this Statement) your  personal information for the purposes described in our
Privacy Policy
and for the following business purposes specified in the CCPA:
Performing services, including maintaining or servicing accounts, providing customer service, processing or fulfilling orders and transactions, verifying customer information, processing payments, providing advertising or marketing services, providing analytics services, or providing similar services
Auditing related to a current interaction with you and concurrent transactions, including, but not limited to, counting ad impressions to unique visitors, verifying positioning and quality of ad impressions, and auditing compliance
Short-term, transient use, including, but not limited to, the contextual customization of ads shown as part of the same interaction
Detecting security incidents, protecting against malicious, deceptive, fraudulent, or illegal activity, and prosecuting those responsible for that activity
Debugging to identify and repair errors that impair existing intended functionality
Undertaking internal research for technological development and demonstration
Undertaking activities to verify or maintain the quality or safety of a service or device that is owned, manufactured, manufactured for, or controlled by us, and to improve, upgrade, or enhance the service or device that is owned, manufactured, manufactured for, or controlled by us.
Sources of Personal Information
We may have obtained personal information about you from various sources,
      as described below.
During the 12-month period prior to the effective date of this Statement, we may have obtained personal information about you from the following categories of sources:
Directly from you, such as when you make a purchase
From your devices, such as in connection with your use of the Services
Your family or friends in connection with their use of the Services, such as by sending information about our products directly to you
Our affiliates and subsidiaries
Vendors who provide services on our behalf
Social networks
Online advertising companies
Government entities
Sale of Personal Information
We do not sell your personal information in exchange for monetary
      compensation. We may allow certain third parties (such as certain
      advertising partners) to collect your personal information via automated
      technologies on our Services in exchange for non-monetary consideration
      (such as an enhanced ability to serve you content and advertisements that
      may be of interest to you). You have the right to opt out of this
      disclosure of your information, as detailed below.
During the 12-month period prior to the effective date of this Statement, we may have sold the following categories of
      personal information to online advertising services and advertising networks:
Identifiers
Protected Classifications
Commercial information
Online Activity
Inferences
We do not sell the personal information of minors under 16 years of age
      without affirmative authorization if we have actual knowledge of the
      individual’s age.
Sharing of Personal Information
During the 12-month period prior to the effective date of this Statement, we may have shared your personal information with certain categories of third parties, as described below.
We may have disclosed the following categories of personal information about you for a business purpose to the following categories of third parties:
Category of Personal Information
Category of Third Party
Identifiers
Our affiliates
Vendors who provide services on our behalf
Professional services organizations, such as auditors and law firms
Online advertising services and advertising  networks
Internet service providers
Data analytics providers
Operating systems and platforms
Social networks
Additional Data Subject to Cal. Civ. Code § 1798.80 Law
Our affiliates
Vendors who provide services on our behalf
Professional services organizations, such as auditors and law firms
Protected Classifications
Our affiliates
Vendors who provide services on our behalf
Professional services organizations, such as auditors and law firms
Online advertising services and advertising  networks
Internet service providers
Data analytics providers
Commercial Information
Our affiliates
Vendors who provide services on our behalf
Professional services organizations, such as auditors and law firms
Online advertising services and advertising  networks
Internet service providers
Data analytics providers
Online Activity
Our affiliates
Vendors who provide services on our behalf
Professional services organizations, such as auditors and law firms
Online advertising services and advertising  networks
Internet service providers
Data analytics providers
Operating systems and platforms
Social networks
Geolocation data
Our affiliates
Vendors who provide services on our behalf
Professional services organizations, such as auditors and law firms
Online advertising services and advertising  networks
Internet service providers
Data analytics providers
Operating systems and platforms
Social networks
Sensory Information
Our affiliates
Vendors who provide services on our behalf
Professional services organizations, such as auditors and law firms
Online advertising services and advertising  networks
Internet service providers
Data analytics providers
Operating systems and platforms
Social networks
Employment Information
Our affiliates
Vendors who provide services on our behalf
Professional services organizations, such as auditors and law firms
Internet service providers
Inferences
Our affiliates
Vendors who provide services on our behalf
Professional services organizations, such as auditors and law firms
Online advertising services and advertising  networks
Internet service providers
Data analytics providers
Operating systems and platforms
Social networks
In addition to the categories of third parties identified above, during the 12-month period prior to the effective date of this Statement, we may have shared personal information about you with government entities.
California Consumer Privacy Rights
You have certain choices regarding our use and disclosure of your personal
    information, as described below.
Access:
You have the right to request, twice in a 12-month period,
      that we disclose to you the personal information we have collected, used,
      disclosed and sold about you during the past 12 months.
Deletion:
You have the right to request that we delete certain
      personal information we have collected from you.
Opt-Out of Sale:
You have the right to opt-out of the sale of your
      personal information.
Shine the Light Request:
You also may have the right to request
      that we provide you with (a) a list of certain categories of personal
      information we have disclosed to third parties for their direct marketing
      purposes during the immediately preceding calendar year and (b) the
      identity of those third parties.
How to Submit a Request:
To submit an access or deletion
    request,
click here
or
Email Us
. To submit a Shine the Light request,
Email Us
. To
    opt-out of the sale of your personal information,
click here
or
Email Us
.
To submit a request as an authorized agent on behalf of a consumer, please
Email Us
.
Verifying Requests:
To help protect your privacy and
    maintain security, we will take steps to verify your identity before
    granting you access to your personal information or complying with your
    request. If you have an account with us, we verify your identity by
    requiring you to sign in to your account. If you do not have an account with
    us and you request access to or deletion of your personal information, there
    is no reasonable method by which we can verify your identity to the level of
    certainty required by the CCPA. The reason for this is that iHerb
    historically has not linked IP addresses, device identifiers or other
    information collected by automated means to named actual persons.
    Accordingly, if you do not have an account with us, and you request access
    to or deletion of your personal information, we will not be able to process
    your request at this time.
Additional Information:
If you choose to exercise
    any of your rights under the CCPA, you have the right to not receive
    discriminatory treatment by us. To the extent permitted by applicable law,
    we may charge a reasonable fee to comply with your request.
For questions or concerns about our privacy policies and practices, please contact us as described in the
How To Contact Us
section of our Privacy Policy.